Utah statutes.
65A-8-303.   Application to alter or remove trees.

(1)  Any person that desires to alter or remove one or more heritage trees from any public property within this state shall before altering or removing any such tree make application to the division on forms prescribed by it.

(2)  An application for alteration or removal shall be filed with the division at least 60 days before the actual alteration or removal of any such trees.

(3)  The application shall state:

(a)  the name of the applicant;

(b)  the number, location, and species of the trees proposed to be altered or removed;

(c)  the reason for alteration or removal; and

(d)  other information as the division may reasonably require.

